Hawaii statutes.
§652-11 Section 652-9 to appear on summons.
Section 652-9 shall be printed or written conspicuously on every summons
issuing out of any court of the State which is intended to be served on any
alleged attorney, factor, trustee, or debtor of a defendant in any action. [L
1876, c 35, §14; RL 1925, §2841; RL 1935, §4280; RL 1945, §10311; RL 1955,
§237-11; HRS §652-11]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next